Illinois, session 104th, HB5262.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Consumer Installment Loan Act is amended by 5changing Section 17.5 as follows: 6    (205 ILCS 670/17.5)7    Sec. 17.5. Consumer reporting service.8    (a) For the purpose of this Section, "certified database" 9means the consumer reporting service database established 10pursuant to the Payday Loan Reform Act. "Title-secured loan" 11means a loan less than 12 months in length in which, at 12commencement, a consumer provides to the licensee, as security 13for the loan, physical possession of the consumer's title to a 14motor vehicle.15    (b) Licensees that do not submit information to at least 16one consumer reporting agency that compiles and maintains 17files on consumers on a nationwide basis, as that term is used 18in 15 U.S.C. 1681a(p), shall enter information regarding each 19loan into the certified database and shall follow the 20Department's related rules.21    (c) For every title-secured loan made, the licensee shall 22input information as provided in 38 Ill. Adm. Code 110.420.23    (d) The certified database provider shall indemnify the   HB5262- 2 -LRB104 18643 BAB 32086 b1licensee against all claims and actions arising from illegal 2or willful or wanton acts on the part of the certified database 3provider. The certified database provider may charge a fee not 4to exceed $1 for each loan entered into the certified 5database. The database provider shall not charge any 6additional fees or charges to the licensee.7(Source: P.A. 101-658, eff. 3-23-21.)